Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,103
Group contract, defined.

Group contract shall mean a contract for health care services which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a specified group. The group contract may include coverage for dependents.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 12.